Louisiana, session 2026, HB1140.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 51:1741.6 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1741.6. Stop The Calls Act
A. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Call authentication technology" means the STIR/SHAKEN protocols
or any successor technology required by federal law.
(2) "Telecommunications provider" means any entity providing voice service
to customers in this state, including interconnected Voice over Internet Protocol, or
VoIP, providers and intermediate providers.
B. A telecommunications provider operating in this state shall do all of the
following:
(1) Implement call authentication technology consistent with federal law and
Federal Communication Commission regulations.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-198 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1140
(2) Maintain and file a robocall mitigation plan consistent with federal
requirements.
(3) Take reasonable steps to prevent, detect, and mitigate unlawful caller
identification spoofing traffic originating on or passing through its network.
(4) Investigate a credible notice from the attorney general that unlawful
spoofed traffic is being transmitted over its network.
C. A telecommunications provider shall not do any of the following:
(1) Knowingly transmit spoofed caller identification information with the
intent to defraud, cause harm, or wrongfully obtain anything of value.
(2) Knowingly provide substantial assistance or support to a person engaged
in unlawful caller identification spoofing.
(3) Continue to carry traffic for a customer or upstream provider after
receiving written notice from the attorney general that the traffic is unlawful, unless
corrective action is taken within thirty days.
D.(1) The attorney general may bring a civil action to enforce the provisions
of this Section, for injunctive relief, civil penalties, restitution, and investigative
costs.
(2) Civil penalties outlined in this Section shall not exceed ten thousand
dollars per knowing violation and one thousand dollars per negligent failure to
implement required mitigation measures.
(3) Each day of continued violation after written notice constitutes a separate
violation.
E. A telecommunications provider shall not be liable pursuant to this Section
if it meets all of the following requirements:
(1) Implements and maintains call authentication technology and mitigation
programs consistent with federal requirements.
(2) Acts in good faith to block or mitigate unlawful traffic.
(3) Does not knowingly facilitate unlawful spoofing.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-198 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1140
F. Nothing in this Section shall impose strict liability on a
telecommunications provider solely because unlawful spoofed traffic transits its
network.
G. This Section shall be interpreted consistently with federal law, including
the Truth in Caller ID Act and the TRACED Act, and shall not be construed to
conflict with federal preemption.
Section 2. This Act shall be known as and may be cited as the "Stop The Calls" Act.